Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB95.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 15 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) When a law enforcement agency seizes or recovers a firearm that was unlawfully
possessed, used for any unlawful purpose, recovered from the scene of a crime, is
reasonably believed to have been used or associated with the commission of a
crime, or is acquired by the agency as an abandoned or discarded firearm, the
agency shall:
(a) Transmit to and receive from the National Crime Information Center
system information relating to that firearm;
(b) Transmit to and receive from the United States Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms
and Explosives eTrace system information relating to that firearm; and
(c) Arrange for every such firearm to be test-fired as soon as practicable and
the results of that test-firing be submitted to the National Integrated
Ballistic Identification Network to determine whether the firearm is
associated with or related to a crime, criminal conduct, any individual
associated with or related to a crime or criminal conduct, or reasonably
believed to be associated or related to a crime or criminal conduct.
(2) When a law enforcement agency recovers any spent shell casing at a crime scene
or has reason to believe that the recovered spent shell casing is related to or
associated with the commission of a crime or the unlawful discharge of a firearm,
the agency shall, as soon as practicable, submit the ballistics information to the
National Integrated Ballistic Identification Network.
(3) Local law enforcement agencies shall develop policies and procedures, approved
by the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, for the recovery and forensic processing
of firearms and firearm-related evidence where a firearm was unlawfully
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 1/3/2025 3:17 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 334
possessed, used for any unlawful purpose, recovered from the scene of a crime, or
reasonably believed to have been used or associated with the commission of a
crime.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/3/2025 3:17 PM Jacketed